District of Columbia statutes.
38-1973

Repealed

Promotions — groups A-1, B, C, and D; administrative errors.

Repealed.

Aug. 5, 1955, 69 Stat. 528, ch. 569, title IV, § 10
Nov. 13, 1966, 80 Stat. 1601, Pub. L. 89-810, title II, § 202(7)
May 27, 1968, 82 Stat. 138, Pub. L. 90-319, § 2(5)
June 30, 1970, 84 Stat. 363, Pub. L. 91-297, title III, § 302(8)
Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1011, Pub. L. 92-518, title I,§ 103(5)
Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-90, § 2(4), 23 DCR 9532b
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 11, 29 DCR 49
1981 Ed., § 31-1135.
1973 Ed., § 31-1535.